vi: Ứng dụng dự định của chất nền nước hoa: Xịt toàn thân; Nước hoa ô tô; Xịt nước hoa cao cấp (EDT/EDP); Dầu nước hoa/dạng lăn; Tán hương qua que khuếch tán; Nước hoa xịt phòng/nhà cửa; Nước hoa khô; Khác
zh-TW: 香水基底預定應用: 身體噴霧; 車用芳香; 高級香水噴霧 (EDT/EDP); 香水油 / 滾珠香水; 擴香瓶; 室內/居家擴香; 香膏; 其他
nl: Parfumeriebasis beoogde toepassing: Bodymist; Autoparfum; Fijne geurspray (EDT/EDP); Parfumolie / roll-on; Geurstokjes; Kamer-/huisparfum; Vast parfum; Overig
th: การทาเบสน้ำหอมที่แนะนำ: สเปรย์ฉีดตัว; น้ำหอมปรับอากาศรถยนต์; สเปรย์น้ำหอม (EDT/EDP); น้ำมันหอมระเหย / แบบลูกกลิ้ง; ก้านไม้หอมปรับอากาศ; น้ำหอมปรับอากาศห้อง/บ้าน; น้ำหอมแห้ง; อื่นๆ
tr: Parfüm bazının amaçlanan kullanım alanı: Vücut spreyi; Araç kokusu; Kaliteli sprey koku (EDT/EDP); Parfüm yağı / roll-on; Çubuklu oda kokusu; Oda/ev kokusu; Katı parfüm; Diğer
sl-SI: Predvideni namen uporabe parfumske osnove: Meglica za telo; Dišava za avto; Fina dišava v pršilu (EDT/EDP); Parfumsko olje/roll-on; Difuzor s palčkami; Dišava za prostor/dom; Trdi parfum; Drugo
de: Verwendungszweck der Parfümbasis: Körperspray; Autoduft; Parfümspray (EdT/EdP); Parfümöl / Roll-on; Stäbchendiffusor; Raum-/Heimduft; Festes Parfüm; Sonstige
sk-SK: Spôsob aplikácie nosnej zložky parfumu: Telový sprej; Vôňa do auta; Jemný vonný sprej (EDT/EDP); Parfumovaný olej / guľôčkový aplikátor (roll-on); Tyčinkový difuzér; Vôňa do miestnosti/domácnosti; Tuhý parfum; Iné
ro-RO: Baza de parfumerie - utilizare prevăzută: Spray de corp (body mist); Parfum auto; Spray cu parfum fin (EDT/EDP); Ulei de parfum / roll-on; Difuzor cu bețișoare; Parfum de cameră/casă; Parfum solid; Altele
it: Applicazione prevista della base di profumeria: Acqua profumata per il corpo; Profumo per auto; Profumo spray (EDT/EDP); Olio profumato / roll-on; Diffusore a bastoncini; Profumo per ambienti/casa; Profumo solido; Altro
ko: 향수 베이스 의도 용도: 바디 미스트; 차량용 방향제; 파인 프래그런스 스프레이(EDT/EDP); 향수 오일 / 롤온; 리드 디퓨저; 룸/홈 프래그런스; 고체 향수; 기타
ja: 香水ベース向け用途: ボディミスト; カーフレグランス; ファインフレグランススプレー（EDT/EDP）; パフュームオイル / ロールオン; リードディフューザー; ルーム/ホームフレグランス; 練り香水; その他
pt-BR: Especifica a variedade ou espécie de pimenta usada no produto, permitindo que os compradores diferenciem entre diferentes perfis de sabor e níveis de ardência.: Body splash; Aromatizante automotivo; Spray de fragrância fina (EDT/EDP); Óleo perfumado / roll-on; Difusor de varetas; Fragrância para ambientes/casa; Perfume sólido; Outro
hu: Parfümbázis tervezett felhasználása: Testpermet; Autóillatosító; Finom parfüm spray (EDT / EDP); Parfümolaj / golyós; Pálcás illatosító; Szoba- / lakásillatosító; Szilárd parfüm; Egyéb
lt-LT: Parfumerijos bazės paskirtis: Kūno dulksna; Automobilio kvapas; Purškiamas kvepalų skystis (EDT / EDP); Kvepalų aliejus / rutuliniai kvepalai; Lazdelinis difuzorius; Kambario / namų kvapas; Kietieji kvepalai; Kita
pl: Zamierzone zastosowanie bazy perfumeryjnej: Mgiełka do ciała; Zapach samochodowy; Aerozol perfumeryjny (EDT/EDP); Olejek perfumowany / roll-on; Dyfuzor z patyczkami; Zapach do pomieszczeń / domu; Perfumy w twardej postaci; Inne
cs: Zamýšlené použití parfémové báze: Tělový sprej; Vůně do auta; Luxusní parfém ve spreji (EDT/EDP); Parfémový olej / roll-on; Tyčinkový difuzér; Vůně do bytu; Tuhý parfém; Ostatní
ru: Назначение парфюмерной базы: Спрей для тела (мист); Ароматизатор для авто; Парфюмерный спрей (туалетная/парфюмерная вода); Парфюмерное масло / ролик; Аромадиффузор с палочками; Ароматизатор для дома/помещения; Твердые духи; Другое
bg-BG: Предназначение на парфюмната база за приложение: Спрей за тяло; Ароматизатор за кола; Фин парфюмен спрей (EDT/EDP); Парфюмно масло / рол-он; Дифузер с пръчици; Ароматизатор за стая/дом; Твърд парфюм; Друго
el: Προβλεπόμενη εφαρμογή βάσης αρώματος: Body mist; Άρωμα αυτοκινήτου; Σπρέι υψηλής αρωματοποιίας (EDT/EDP); Αρωματικό έλαιο / roll-on; Αρωματικό χώρου με sticks; Άρωμα δωματίου/σπιτιού; Στέρεο άρωμα; Άλλο
fr: Usage prévu de la base de parfumerie: Brume pour le corps; Parfum pour voiture; Vaporisateur de parfum fin (EDT/EDP); Huile parfumée / roll-on; Diffuseur à bâtonnets; Parfum d’ambiance/d’intérieur; Parfum solide; Autre
es: Aplicación prevista de base portadora en perfumería: Bruma corporal; Fragancia para coche; Aerosol de fragancia fina (EDT/EDP); Aceite de perfume/roll-on; Difusor de varillas; Fragancia para habitación/hogar; Perfume sólido; Otro
sv: Avsett användningsområde för parfymbas: Body mist; Bildoft; Parfymspray (EDT/EDP); Parfymolja/roll-on; Doftpinnar; Rums-/hemdoft; Fast parfym; Övrigt
fi: Hajustepohjan käyttötarkoitus: Vartalosuihke; Auton tuoksu; Hajuvesisuihke (EDT/EDP); Hajuvesiöljy / roll-on; Tikkutuoksu; Huone-/kotituoksu; Kiinteä hajuvesi; Muu
pt-PT: Aplicação básica de perfumaria: Bruma corporal; Fragrância para carro; Spray de fragrância fina (EDT/EDP); Óleo de perfume/roll-on; Difusor de varetas; Fragrância para ambiente/casa; Perfume sólido; Outra
en: Perfumery base intended application: Body mist; Car fragrance; Fine fragrance spray (EDT/EDP); Perfume oil / roll-on; Reed diffuser; Room/home fragrance; Solid perfume; Other
hr-HR: Parfumerijska baza namijenjena aplikacija: Maglica za tijelo; Miris za automobil; Fini mirisni sprej (EDT/EDP); Parfemsko ulje / roll-on; Difuzor sa štapićima; Miris za sobu / dom; Kruti parfem; Ostalo
da: Tilsigtet anvendelse af parfumebase: Body mist; Bilduft; Parfumespray (EDT/EDP); Parfumeolie/roll-on; Pindeduft; Rum-/boligduft; Fast parfume; Andet
nb: Parfymebase – tiltenkt bruk: Kroppsspray; Bilduft; Parfymespray (EDT/EDP); Parfymeolje / roll-on; Duftpinner; Rom-/hjemmeduft; Fast parfyme; Annet
zh-CN: 香水基料预期用途: 身体喷雾; 车载香水; 高级香水喷雾（EDT/EDP）; 香水油/走珠; 藤条香薰; 室内/家居香氛; 固体香水; 其他